Utah statutes.
41-1a-112.   Authority to administer oaths.

Officers and employees of the division designated by the commission for the purpose of administering the motor vehicle laws may administer oaths and acknowledge signatures and shall do so without fee.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 1, 1992 General Session

